California, session 20252026, AB2492.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 6.6 (commencing with Section 8594.20) is added to Chapter 7 of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code, to read: Article 6.6. Mega Sporting Event Public Safety8594.20. (a) For purposes of this article:(1)“City” means the City of Los Angeles.(2)(1) “Mega sporting event” means any of the following:(A) Super Bowl LXI 2027.(B) The 2028 Summer Olympic Games.(C) The 2028 Paralympic Games.(3)(2) “Office” means the Office of Emergency Services.(b) The office shall, in collaboration with the city host counties and any relevant host committee or partners, partner, prepare for the planning, resourcing, management, and delivery of safety and security at and around a mega sporting event. event and any official watch party.(c) In complying with subdivision (b), the office shall consider all of the following:(1) The work of the office’s Large Stadium Initiative.(2) The office’s experience implementing federal National Special Security Event planning and preparedness activities.(3) Strategies that increase public safety and reduce risks associated with all of the following:(A) Human trafficking.(B) Racism, sexism, and other forms of discrimination.(C) Any other safety issue that might arise in connection with a national-level sporting event.(d) (1) By January 1, 2027, the office shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the city host counties and any other necessary party to implement this section.(2) The memorandum required by paragraph (1) shall comply with the Master Mutual Aid Agreement.(e) This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because Super Bowl LXI 2027, the 2028 Summer Olympic Games, and the 2028 Paralympic Games will take place in the City of Los Angeles. host counties.SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.